Utah statutes.
78B-5-404.   Variation by agreement.

(1)  The effect of provisions of this part may be varied by agreement of the parties made at any time before or after commencement of an action, distribution proceeding, or the entry of judgment.

(2)  The parties may agree upon the money to be used in a transaction giving rise to a foreign-money claim and may use different money for different aspects of the transaction. Stating the price in a foreign money or for a particular transaction does not require, of itself, the use of that money for other aspects of the transaction.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

